Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 1 COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION
23-1-109. Duties and powers of the commission with regard to off-campus instruction - provision of concurrent enrollment programs - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly declares its intent that the state-supported institutions of higher education may engage in instruction off the geographic boundaries of their campuses.

The commission shall define, after consultation with the governing boards of institutions, the geographic and programmatic service areas for each state-supported institution of higher education. No such institution shall provide instruction off-campus in programs or in geographic areas or at sites not approved by the commission, unless otherwise provided by law.

The general assembly declares its intent that all instruction at two-year institutions, including the first two years of instruction at Adams state university and Colorado Mesa university, shall be funded throughout the institutions' commission-approved service area on the same basis as on-campus instruction.

The department shall administer any centralized, statewide extension and continuing education program of instruction that may be offered by any state-supported baccalaureate and graduate institution. All instruction offered outside the geographic boundaries of the campus, including instruction delivered by television or other technological means, shall be a part of this program unless exempted by policy and action of the commission.

The commission shall set policies, after consultation with the governing boards of institutions, which define which courses and programs taught outside the geographic boundaries of the campus may be eligible for general fund support. The commission may include funding for those courses and programs in its systemwide funding recommendations to the general assembly.

As used in this subsection (6), unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission-approved two-year institution" means the two-year institution of higher education in whose college service area the local education provider is located.

"Two-year institution of higher education" means a state-supported institution of higher education with a two-year role and mission, including the community college role and mission of Adams state university and Colorado Mesa university.

The commission shall establish a policy that facilitates local education provider participation in a concurrent enrollment program or course, pursuant to article 35 of title 22, with a two-year institution of higher education that is outside of the geographic boundaries of the commission-approved college service area in which the local education provider is located. The commission's policy shall apply when a local education provider has requested in writing, after the adoption of the commission policy pursuant to this subsection (6)(b), a concurrent enrollment program or course from the commission-approved two-year institution and the commission-approved two-year institution declines in writing to provide the requested concurrent enrollment program or course. A two-year institution of higher education that fails to agree or decline in writing to provide a concurrent enrollment program or course in response to a written request within forty-five days of receiving the request shall be deemed to have declined to provide the program or course.

Nothing in this section requires a local education provider to enter into a cooperative agreement for a concurrent enrollment program or course or precludes two-year institutions of higher education from entering into voluntary service area waiver agreements under which a two-year institution of higher education agrees to allow another two-year institution of higher education to provide a concurrent enrollment program or course within its commission-approved college service area.

When a two-year institution of higher education provides a concurrent enrollment program or course outside of its commission-approved college service area in accordance with commission policies established pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section or pursuant to a voluntary service area waiver agreement with another two-year institution of higher education, the concurrent enrollment program or course shall be funded as though offered as on-campus instruction within the commission-approved college service area of the two-year institution of higher education providing the concurrent enrollment program or course.

Nothing in this subsection (6) affects provisions contained in article 35 of title 22 relating to the tuition rate paid for a concurrent enrollment program or course.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 757, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(3) amended, p. 857, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(4) amended, p. 1473, § 9, effective May 28.

L. 2011:

(3) amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1365, § 14, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 757, § 9, effective May 19.

L. 2018:

(6) added, (HB 18-1052), ch. 48, p. 483, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-1-109.5 as it existed prior to 1985.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

23-1-109.3. Duties and powers of the commission with regard to student data - memorandum of understanding.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 22-2-111 (3)(a), C.R.S., the commission shall enter into a memorandum of understanding on or before September 1, 2006, with the state board of education to adopt a policy to share student data. At a minimum, the policy shall ensure that the exchange of information is conducted in conformance with the requirements of the federal "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974", as amended, 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g, and all federal regulations and applicable guidelines adopted in accordance therewith. The policy shall additionally require the department, upon request, to share student data with qualified researchers. For purposes of this section, qualified researchers shall include, but need not be limited to, institutions of higher education, school districts, and public policy research and advocacy organizations.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 716, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1473, § 10, effective May 28.

23-1-109.5. Duties and powers of the commission with regard to fiscal accountability. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1140, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1795, § 6, effective May 31.

23-1-109.7. Duties and powers of the commission with regard to the provision of educational services.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

Beginning July 1, 2005, the commission is responsible for ensuring the provision of postsecondary educational services pursuant to part 3 of article 18 of this title 23. The department of higher education on behalf of the commission shall annually enter into fee-for-service contracts with one or more governing boards of institutions of higher education pursuant to section 23-18-303.5 to provide the higher education services specified in section 23-18-301.

The commission shall make annual funding recommendations to the general assembly and the governor regarding the funding necessary for the department of higher education to contract on the commission's behalf for the provision of higher education services in the state, including but not limited to the services specified in sections 23-18-301 and 23-18-303.5. The general assembly shall annually appropriate to the commission an amount of general fund money to carry out the purposes of this section.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 717, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (1)(h) amended, p. 1014, § 6, effective June 2.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 610, § 2, effective May 9.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (SB 17-297), ch. 210, p. 818, § 6, effective May 18.

L. 2020:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 833, § 10, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references:

For the legislative findings and declarations contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 215, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

23-1-109.8. Duties and powers of the commission with regard to employment first policies.

The commission shall facilitate employment first policies and practices by providing department input and assistance to the employment first advisory partnership described in section 8-84-303, C.R.S., in carrying out its duties.

The department shall present the reports and recommendations of the employment first advisory partnership to the department's legislative committee of reference pursuant to section 8-84-303 (7), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-077), ch. 360, p. 1506, § 7, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 16-077, see section 1 of chapter 360, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

23-1-110. Organization, meetings, and staff.

The commission shall adopt its own rules of procedure, shall elect a chairman, a vice-chairman, and such other officers as it deems necessary, and shall keep a record of its proceedings, which shall be open to public inspection. Meetings of the commission shall be open to the public at all times; but, by a two-thirds vote of the members present at any meeting, the commission may go into executive session for consideration of personnel matters in accordance with part 4 of article 6 of title 24, C.R.S. No final policy decision, resolution, rule, regulation, or formal action and no action approving a contract calling for the payment of money shall be adopted or approved at any executive session.

The governor shall appoint, with the consent of the senate, an executive director qualified by substantial training and experience in the field of higher education. The executive director shall be the executive officer of the commission and the department, shall serve at the pleasure of the governor, and shall receive compensation commensurate with the duties of the office as determined by the governor. The duties and responsibilities of the executive director shall be discharged in accordance with the policies, procedures, and directives of the commission and the department. The executive director shall employ such professional and clerical personnel as deemed necessary to carry out the duties and functions of the commission and the department. Offices held by the executive director and professional personnel are declared to be educational in nature and not under the state personnel system.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1474, § 11, effective May 28, 2008.)

The executive director shall conduct all studies and programs of the commission and coordinate such studies and programs with those of other state agencies having duties and functions concerned with higher education, so as to avoid duplication of programs and staff.

The executive director shall review and approve or deny any proposed action or recommendation of the private occupational school board acting pursuant to article 64 of this title 23.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 758, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(4) added, p. 1157, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 2123, § 4, effective June 11.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 881, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(b) amended, p. 278, § 7, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

(2) and (4) amended, p. 1474, § 11, effective May 28.

L. 2017:

(4) amended, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1204, § 8, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-1-104 as it existed prior to 1985.

23-1-110.5. Study of higher education organization - legislative declaration - issues - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 672, § 1, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

Subsection (7) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2001. (See L. 99, p. 672.)

23-1-111. Commission study - governance and administration of vocational and occupational education. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 758, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1986. (See L. 85, p. 758.)

23-1-112. Tuition - reciprocal agreements.

Except as provided in section 23-1-108 (10), the commission shall identify those circumstances where the waiving of the nonresident differential in tuition rates, on a reciprocal basis with other states, would enhance educational opportunities for Colorado residents. Relative to such identified circumstances, the commission shall negotiate with the other states involved with the objective of establishing reciprocal agreements for the waiving of the nonresidential differential for Colorado residents attending state institutions of higher education in other states in exchange for Colorado state institutions of higher education waiving the nonresident differential for residents of the other states. Agreements negotiated between Colorado and other states shall provide for an equal number of resident and nonresident students to be exchanged between the states. Upon successful completion of such negotiations, the commission may identify the numbers of Colorado residents by grade level whose educational opportunities would be enhanced and the numbers of nonresident students by grade level for whom the nonresident differential is to be waived by the Colorado state institutions of higher education and may direct that the state institutions of higher education grant such waivers. The commission shall establish regulations for the administration of this section, based on the application of the closest college concept, and for the reporting to the general assembly of the numbers of students to whom the waivers are given.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 759, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-1-112.5 as it existed prior to 1985.

23-1-113. Commission directive - admission standards for baccalaureate and graduate institutions of higher education - policy - report - definitions.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, the commission shall establish and the governing boards shall implement academic admission standards for first-time freshmen and transfer students at all state-supported baccalaureate and graduate institutions of higher education in the state. The commission shall establish and may subsequently review and amend the standards after consultation with the governing boards of institutions. The academic admission standards for students who do not have in-state status, as determined pursuant to section 23-7-103, shall equal or exceed those established for determining admission of in-state students.

The standards established for first-time admitted freshman students must use high school academic performance indicators as an eligibility criterion. The academic performance indicators may include, but are not limited to, grade point average, class rank, and content standard performance level assessments. In considering the high school academic performance indicators, the commission and the governing boards may take into account the rigor of a student's high school academic preparation and the academic content of the courses taken. In lieu of the established statewide criteria, each governing board may use additional criteria for up to twenty percent of the freshmen students annually admitted to each institution under the governing board's control. Students who meet the minimum criteria for admission are not guaranteed admission to the institution to which they have applied, but they are eligible for consideration.

The governing board of a state-supported baccalaureate and graduate institution of higher education may, but is not required to, require a national assessment test score as an eligibility criterion.

The criteria established and the specified performance levels must be consistent with the role and mission established for each state-supported baccalaureate and graduate institution of higher education.

On or before an application deadline, an applicant may submit a national assessment test score to a state-supported baccalaureate and graduate institution of higher education that does not require a national assessment test score as an eligibility criterion and request that the institution consider the national assessment test score. The institution shall consider a national test score submission pursuant to this subsection (1)(b)(IV) as a part of the admission decision for the applicant.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the governing board of a state-supported institution of higher education shall not consider a legacy preference, as defined in section 23-1-101.1, as eligible criteria for admission standards. The governing board may ask questions regarding familial relationships to alumni of the institution in order to collect data.

The standards established for transfer students must use college academic performance indicators as the eligibility criteria for admitted transfer students. The academic performance indicators may include but are not limited to grade point average, credit hours completed, and successful completion of developmental education courses, if required and as appropriate considering the role and mission of the receiving institution. In lieu of such criteria, additional criteria may be used for up to twenty percent of the admitted transfer students. The academic admission standards and policies established for transfer students must be consistent with the student transfer agreements established by the commission pursuant to section 23-1-108 (7)(f). Students who meet the minimum criteria for admission are not guaranteed admission to the institution to which they have applied, but they are eligible for consideration.

Repealed.

(1.5) (a) (I) The commission shall establish and the governing boards shall implement a policy pursuant to section 23-1-113.3 to identify matriculated students who need additional supports to be successful in gateway courses in English and mathematics and standards and procedures whereby state institutions of higher education may offer supplemental academic instruction or developmental education courses as provided in section 23-1-113.3. The commission's policy must prohibit the placement of a student in developmental education courses based on a single instrument or test and must be designed to maximize the likelihood that a student will complete gateway courses in English and mathematics within one year. In addition, the commission's policy must require state institutions to use an evidence-based placement approach to placing students into English as a second language courses, and placement of these students must be designed to maximize the likelihood that a student placed in English as a second language courses will complete gateway courses in English within three years. The commission, in consultation with the governing boards, shall ensure that the policy aligns with the admission policy adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. In identifying the standards for developmental education, the commission may differentiate requirements for mathematics based on the prerequisite skills needed for required courses within a student's declared program of study.

As part of the policy established pursuant to this subsection (1.5)(a), all state institutions of higher education are authorized to provide supplemental academic instruction even if the institution is not authorized to provide developmental education courses pursuant to section 23-1-113.3. The institution may receive stipend payments from the state pursuant to section 23-18-202 on behalf of an eligible undergraduate student, as defined in section 23-18-102 (5), who is enrolled in a college-level course that includes supplemental academic instruction or co-requisite support or who is enrolled in a pilot program pursuant to section 23-1-113.3 (1)(a)(III).

Each governing board shall adopt policies and procedures that are aligned with the policy established by the commission pursuant to subsection (1.5)(a) of this section and that ensure that, to the extent required by the commission policy, each matriculated student who may need additional supports to be successful in gateway courses in English and mathematics has access to supplemental academic instruction. The institution that enrolls the student shall select which measures to use from among those that meet the standards established in the commission policy. The commission, in consultation with the governing boards, shall collect information regarding the measures used by the institutions for placement to help analyze the data reported pursuant to subsection (9) of this section and by section 23-1-113.3 (4).

All students enrolled in programs that require gateway courses in English and mathematics at state institutions of higher education should complete gateway courses by the time the student completes thirty college-level credit hours.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 201, § 16, effective August 4, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 1236, § 78, effective August 7, 1996.)

The commission shall work with the state board of education to align the academic admission standards established pursuant to this section with the guidelines for high school graduation requirements developed pursuant to section 22-2-106 (1)(a.5), C.R.S. Any revised academic admission standards shall be implemented no later than the selection of the freshman class of fall 2012.

On or before December 15, 2009, pursuant to section 22-7-1008, C.R.S., the commission shall consult with the state board of education, and the commission and the state board of education shall negotiate a consensus and adopt the description of postsecondary and workforce readiness.

On or before July 1, 2015, and on or before July 1 every six years thereafter, the commission and the state board of education may adopt revisions to the postsecondary and workforce readiness description.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a student who graduates with a high school diploma that includes a postsecondary and workforce readiness endorsement based on criteria adopted by the state board and approved by the commission and the governing boards of the state institutions of higher education pursuant to section 22-7-1009, C.R.S., shall be guaranteed:

To meet minimum academic qualifications for admission to, and to be eligible, subject to additional institutional review of other admission and placement qualifications, for placement into credit-bearing courses at, all open, modified open, or moderately selective public institutions of higher education in Colorado; and

To receive priority consideration, in conjunction with additional admissions criteria, and to be eligible, subject to additional institutional review of other admission and placement qualifications, for placement into credit-bearing courses, at all other public institutions of higher education in Colorado. The additional admissions criteria shall be determined by each institution of higher education.

On or before December 15, 2013, based on adoption of the description of postsecondary and workforce readiness, the commission shall, if necessary, revise the minimum academic admission standards for first-time freshmen at all state-supported baccalaureate and graduate institutions of higher education in the state to ensure that the minimum academic admission standards are aligned with the description of postsecondary and workforce readiness adopted by the commission and the state board of education.

On or before December 15, 2013, the commission shall review the policy established pursuant to subsection (1.5)(a) of this section and the developmental education placement or assessment tests administered pursuant to subsection (1.5) of this section to ensure that the policy and tests are aligned with the postsecondary and workforce readiness description.

Consistent with any revisions adopted pursuant to this section to the description of postsecondary and workforce readiness, the commission shall, if necessary, adopt revisions to the minimum academic admission standards, the policy established pursuant to subsection (1.5)(a) of this section, and the developmental education placement or assessment tests to ensure continued alignment with the postsecondary and workforce readiness description.

In revising the minimum academic admission standards, the policy established pursuant to subsection (1.5)(a) of this section, and the developmental education placement or assessment tests pursuant to this subsection (8), the commission shall consult with the governing boards of the state institutions of higher education.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I) to the contrary, on or before February 15, 2012, and on or before April 15 each year thereafter, the department of higher education shall submit to the state board of education, the department of education, and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, a report, subject to available data, for the high school graduating classes of the preceding six academic years concerning:

The need for additional supports for students to be successful in gateway courses in English and mathematics, the subject for which the students are identified as needing additional supports to be successful in gateway courses, and student success in gateway courses;

First-year college grades; and

Types of academic certificates and degrees attained at all postsecondary institutions in Colorado and the United States.

The department of higher education shall report the information disaggregated by high school and school district of graduation, to the extent practicable, and by ethnicity, gender, financial aid status, and any other characteristic deemed relevant by the commission. The department of higher education and the department of education shall also make the report available on their respective websites.

On or before February 15, 2009, and on or before April 15 each year thereafter, the department of higher education shall submit to the department of education the unit records used for its reporting purposes under this section to enable the department of education to evaluate the effectiveness of the alignment of the preschool through postsecondary education systems in preparing students who demonstrate postsecondary and workforce readiness and subsequently succeed in postsecondary education and to enable the department of higher education to disseminate the unit records to the appropriate school districts.

(10.5) (a) On or before June 30, 2023, and on or before June 30 each year thereafter, the department shall publish and submit to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, an annual report for the previous academic year. The data elements in the report are intended to determine whether requiring or not requiring a national assessment test score as an eligibility criterion for the admissions process for state-supported baccalaureate and graduate institutions of higher education provides greater diversity among institutions without causing negative student outcomes that are directly attributable to the change in the admissions process. The report must specify:

The institutions that required, and the institutions that did not require, a national assessment test score as an eligibility criterion for the previous academic year's first-time freshman students;

The percentage of first-time freshman students who submitted a national assessment test score and the percentage of first-time freshman students who did not submit a national assessment test score, reported for the state as a whole and for each institution, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender;

The percentage of first-time freshman students who submitted a national assessment test score and enrolled in an institution and the percentage of first-time freshman students who did not submit a national assessment test score and enrolled in an institution, reported for the state as a whole and for each institution, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender;

The percentage of first-time freshman students who submitted a national assessment test score who continued enrollment in the institution in a subsequent academic year and the percentage of first-time freshman students who did not submit a national assessment test score who continued enrollment in the institution in a subsequent academic year, reported for the state as a whole and for each institution, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender;

The percentage of first-time freshman students who submitted a national assessment test score who graduated from an institution in four years and the percentage of first-time freshman students who did not submit a national assessment test score who graduated from an institution in four years, reported for the state as a whole and for each institution, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender;

The percentage of first-time freshman students who submitted a national assessment test score who graduated from an institution in six years and the percentage of first-time freshman students who did not submit a national assessment test score who graduated from an institution in six years, reported for the state as a whole and for each institution, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender; and

The following available data, gathered by the department in collaboration with the institutions:

The percentage of first-time freshman students who submitted a national assessment test score who were accepted to an institution and the percentage of first-time freshman students who did not submit a national assessment test score who were accepted to an institution;

The percentage of first-time freshman students who submitted a national assessment test score who are resident first-generation undergraduate students, as defined in section 23-18-302 (12), and continued enrollment in the institution in a subsequent academic year and the percentage of first-time freshman students who did not submit a national assessment test score who are resident first-generation undergraduate students, as defined in section 23-18-302 (12), and continued enrollment in the institution in a subsequent academic year, reported for the state as a whole and for each institution, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender;

The percentage of first-time freshman students who submitted a national assessment test score who are resident first-generation undergraduate students, as defined in section 23-18-302 (12), and graduated from an institution in four years, and the percentage of first-time freshman students who did not submit a national assessment test score who are resident first-generation undergraduate students, as defined in section 23-18-302 (12), and graduated from an institution in four years, reported for the state as a whole and for each institution, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender;

The percentage of first-time freshman students who submitted a national assessment test score who are resident first-generation undergraduate students, as defined in section 23-18-302 (12), and graduated from an institution in six years, and the percentage of first-time freshman students who did not submit a national assessment test score who are resident first-generation undergraduate students, as defined in section 23-18-302 (12), and graduated from an institution in six years, reported for the state as a whole and for each institution, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender;

The percentage of first-time freshman students who submitted a national assessment test score who are eligible for a federal Pell grant and continued enrollment in the institution in a subsequent academic year and the percentage of first-time freshman students who did not submit a national assessment test score who are eligible for a federal Pell grant and continued enrollment in the institution in a subsequent academic year, reported for the state as a whole and for each institution, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender;

The percentage of first-time freshman students who submitted a national assessment test score who are eligible for a federal Pell grant and graduated from an institution in four years, and the percentage of first-time freshman students who did not submit a national assessment test score who are eligible for a federal Pell grant and graduated from an institution in four years, reported for the state as a whole and for each institution, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender; and

The percentage of first-time freshman students who submitted a national assessment test score who are eligible for a federal Pell grant and graduated from an institution in six years, and the percentage of first-time freshman students who did not submit a national assessment test score who are eligible for a federal Pell grant and graduated from an institution in six years, reported for the state as a whole and for each institution, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender.

On or before June 30, 2027, and on or before June 30, 2032, the commission shall publish and submit a report to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, that at a minimum includes a comprehensive analysis of the annual reports submitted pursuant to this subsection (10.5) and an analysis of how the optional use of a national assessment test score as an eligibility criterion impacted access to higher education for students. After the report described in this subsection (10.5)(b) is submitted, the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, shall hold a joint meeting at which the commission shall present and discuss the report.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I) to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2023, and on or before June 30 each year thereafter, the department shall submit to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, the reports described in subsections (10.5)(a) and (10.5)(b) of this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Academic skills courses" means courses that teach the basic academic skills necessary to succeed at a postsecondary institution.

"Developmental education courses" means courses that are prerequisites to the level of work expected at a postsecondary institution and include academic skills courses and preparatory courses.

"Gateway course" means the first college-level course in English or mathematics that is approved for statewide transfer pursuant to section 23-1-125 (3) and that a student takes to fulfill the English or mathematics requirement for the student's program of study.

"National assessment test score" includes, but is not limited to, an ACT test score or SAT test score.

"Preparatory courses" means courses designed for students who demonstrate a deficient skill level in the general competencies necessary to succeed in a standard postsecondary curriculum and include but are not limited to reading courses that focus on nontechnical vocabulary, word identification, and reading of everyday material; writing courses that focus primarily on grammar, usage, punctuation, and effective sentences and paragraphs; and mathematics courses primarily covering concepts introduced in elementary and intermediate algebra and geometry.

"Supplemental academic instruction" means academic support models that use peer or instructor study sessions or individualized in-class academic support to improve student learning, retention, or success. "Supplemental academic instruction" also includes co-requisite and modified co-requisite supports. "Supplemental academic instruction" does not include prerequisite developmental education courses.

As referenced in subsection (11)(e)(I) of this section, co-requisite or modified co-requisite supports are designed for students identified as needing additional supports to be successful in college-level gateway courses. Co-requisite models pair a transfer-level course with a support course, extending the instructional time through additional lecture or lab hours, or require students to participate in academic support services in mathematics, English, or writing.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article R&RE, p. 759, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(a) amended, p. 2124, § 5, effective June 11.

L. 94:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1795, § 7, effective May 31.

L. 95:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended and (3) added, p. 54, § 3, effective March 20; (2) amended, p. 39, § 2, effective January 1, 1996.

L. 96:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended, p. 171, § 1, effective July 1; (2) and (3)(b) amended, p. 1236, § 78, effective August 7.

L. 99:

(2) repealed, p. 849, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2000:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1484, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(b)(I)(B), (1)(c), and (3)(a) amended, p. 201, § 16, effective August 4.

L. 2007:

(4) added, p. 678, § 5, effective May 2.

L. 2008:

(5) to (10) added, p. 769, § 5, effective May 14.

L. 2010:

(6)(b) amended, (HB 10-1013), ch. 399, p. 1912, § 35, effective June 10; (1)(c) amended, (HB 10-1208), ch. 191, p. 822, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(1), (8), (9), and (10) amended and (1.5) and (11) added, (HB 12-1155), ch. 255, p. 1273, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2015:

(6) repealed, (HB 15-1323), ch. 204, p. 735, § 59, effective May 20.

L. 2017:

(9) amended, (HB 17-1251), ch. 253, p. 1058, § 4, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1)(c), (1.5), (8)(b), (8)(c), (8)(d), (9), (10), (11)(b), and (11)(e) amended and (11)(b.5) added, (HB 19-1206), ch. 133, p. 593, § 2, effective April 25.

L. 2020:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 20-1407), ch. 254, p. 1238, § 1, effective July 8.

L. 2021:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (11)(c) amended and (10.5) added, (HB 21-1067), ch. 184, p. 988, § 1, effective May 25; (1)(b)(V) added, (HB 21-1173), ch. 185, p. 994, § 3, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(d)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(d), effective June 30, 1988. (See L. 85, p. 759.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending subsections (2) and (3)(b), see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act enacting subsection (4), see section 1of chapter 182, Session Laws of Colorado 2007. For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1206, see section 1 of chapter 133, Session Laws of Colorado 2019. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1173, see section 1 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.